src/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! Adposition lexicon
! ===================

! First come the 3 continuation lexica, the division is based on Spiik
! and should probably be revised. Then comes the adpositions themselves.


! Assigning tags to the adpositions

LEXICON Pp
 +Po:%>0 K ;
 +Pr:%>0 K ;

LEXICON Postp
 +Po:%>0 K ;

LEXICON Prep
 +Pr:%>0 K ;


! The adposition list itself.


LEXICON Adposition
allela Postp ; !derived noun
allelattjaj Postp ; !derived noun
allelattjan Postp ; !derived noun
allelij Postp ; !derived noun
allelin Pp ; !derived noun
allelis Postp ; !derived noun
allelis Pp ; !derived noun
badjel Pp ; !derived noun
badjela Pp ; !derived noun
badjelasj Pp ; !derived noun
badjelattjaj Postp ; !derived noun
badjelattjan Postp ; !derived noun
badjelij Postp ; !derived noun
badjelin Postp ; !derived noun
badjelis Postp ; !derived noun
badjen Postp ;
bajebuj Pp ; !adj
bajebun Pp ; !adj
bajelt Postp ;
baktu Postp ;
biejvvela Postp ;
bielen Postp ; !noun
bieles Postp ; !noun
birra Pp ; !
birraj Postp ;
birális Pp ;
birán Postp ;
boaktjolij Postp ;
boaktjolin Postp ;
boaktjolis Postp ;
buohta Postp ;
báldan Postp ; !noun
báldas Postp ; !noun
bálldaj Postp ; !noun
bálldal Pp ; !noun
bálldalattjaj Pp ; !derived noun
bálldalattjan Pp ; !derived noun
bálldalij Pp ; !derived noun
bálldalin Pp ; !derived noun
sisbælláj Postp ; !noun
duogásjbælláj Postp ;
bælláj Postp ; !noun
dagi Postp ;
dagá Postp ;
davebuj Pp ; !derived noun
davebun Pp ; !derived noun
davebuttjaj Pp ; !derived noun
davebuttjan Pp ; !derived noun
davvelattjaj Postp ; !derived noun
davvelattjaj Pp ; !derived noun
davvelattjan Pp ; !derived noun
davvelij Pp ; !derived noun
davvelin Pp ; !derived noun
davvelis Pp ; !derived noun
diehti Postp ;
!dievva Postp ; !noun
duobbel Pp ;
duobbela Pp ;
duobbelattjaj Pp ;
duobbelattjan Pp ;
duobbelij Pp ;
duobbelin Pp ;
duobbelis Pp ;
duobbilij Pp ;
duoge Postp ; !noun
duogen Postp ; !noun
duogen+Adv:duoge%>n PxC ; !Px generated by noun file
duoges Postp ; !noun
duoges+Adv:duoge%>st PxC ; !Px generated by noun file
duogev Postp ; !noun
duohkelattjaj Postp ;  !derived noun
duohkelattjan Postp ; !derived noun
duohkelij Postp ; !derived noun
duohkelin Postp ; !derived noun
duohkelis Postp ; !derived noun
duohkáj Postp ; !noun
duohkáj+Adv:duohká%>s PxC ; !Px generated by noun file
!duoppebun Pp ; !adj
dábbel Pp ;
dábbela Pp ;
dábbelattjaj Pp ;
dábbelattjan Pp ;
dábbelij Pp ;
dábbelin Pp ;
dábbelis Pp ;
!dáfos Postp ; !noun
!dáppebuj Pp ; !adj
!dáppebun Pp ; !adj
dåbbel Pp ;
dåbbelattjaj Pp ;
dåbbelattjan Pp ;
dåbbelij Pp ;
dåbbelin Pp ;
dåbbelis Pp ;
dåbbilij Pp ;
dåbel Pp ;
dåbela Pp ;
dåbelij Postp ;
dåbelij Pp ;
dåbelin Pp ;
dåbelis Pp ;
dåbelt Pp ;
!dålebun Pp ; !adj
!dåppebuj Pp ; !adj
!dåppebun Pp ; !adj
dåppelt Pp ;
!fáron Postp ; !noun
gaska Postp ; !noun
gaskaj Postp ; !noun
gaskal Prep ; !derived noun
gaskan Postp ; !noun
gaskas Postp ; !noun
gaskav Postp ; !noun
gassjkusabbo Pp ;
gasska Postp ; !noun
gasskaj Postp ; !noun
gasskal Pp ; !derived noun
gasskala Postp ; !derived noun
gassko Postp ;
gassko Pp ;
goabbel Pp ;
goabbelij Prep ; ! Ill
goabbelin Prep ; ! Ine
goabbelis Prep ; ! Ela
guoktel Postp ; !derived noun
guoktela Postp ; !derived noun
guoran Postp ; !noun
guoras Postp ; !noun
guorav Postp ; !noun
guorra Postp ; !noun
guorraj Postp ; !noun
guorran Postp ; !noun
guovddelappot Pp ; !derived noun
guovddelav Postp ; !derived noun
guovddelij Postp ; !derived noun
guovddelin Pp ; !derived noun
guovddelis Postp ; !derived noun
!guovlluj Postp ; !noun
gáktuj Postp ;
!gássjelabbo Pp ; !adj
gáttebuj Pp ; !compared noun
gávttuj Postp ;
hárráj Postp ; !noun
hárráj+Err/Orth:hárraj Postp ; !noun
!hærráj Postp ; !noun
innis Pp ; !OK: innan
ietján% gå Pp ;
!jaskádabbo Pp ; !adj, and typo of jaskadabbo?
juobbela Postp ;
juobbela Pp ;
juobbelin Postp ;
!lagábuj Pp ; !adj
!lagábun Pp ; !adj
!lagábuttjaj Postp ; !adj
!lagábuttjan Postp ; !adj
!lagábuttjat Postp ; !adv
!lagámusán Pp ; !adj
lahka Postp ; !
lahka Pp ; !
lahkusij Pp ;
lahkusin Postp ;
lahkusis Postp ;
lullela Postp ;	  !derived noun
lullelattja Postp ;  !derived noun
lullelattja Pp ;	  !derived noun
lullelattjaj Postp ; !derived noun
lullelattjaj Pp ;	  !derived noun
lullelattjan Postp ; !derived noun
lullelattjan Pp ;	  !derived noun
lullelij Pp ;		  !derived noun
lullelin Postp ;	  !derived noun
lullelin Pp ;		  !derived noun
lullelis Postp ;	  !derived noun
lullelis Pp ;		  !derived noun
lunna:lunºna Postp ;
lunna Postp ;
lunne Postp ;
lusa Postp ;
lusi Postp ;
lussta Postp ;
lusste Postp ;
lusá Postp ;
made Postp ;
manen Postp ;
manep Prep ; !typo of maŋep (see korp), maŋep is a comp noun
maŋelt Postp ;
maŋen Postp ;
maŋen+Adv:maŋe%>n PxC ; !Px generated by noun file
maŋŋel Postp ;		  !derived noun
maŋŋela Postp ;	  !derived noun
maŋŋela+Err/Orth:mannela Postp ;
maŋŋela Pp ;		  !derived noun
maŋŋela+Err/Orth:mannela Pp ;		  !derived noun
maŋŋelasj Pp ;		  !derived noun
maŋŋelattja Pp ;	  !derived noun
maŋŋelattjaj Postp ; !derived noun
maŋŋelattjan Postp ; !derived noun
maŋŋelij Pp ;		  !derived noun
maŋŋelin Pp ;		  !derived noun
maŋŋelis Pp ;		  !derived noun
maŋŋáj Postp ; !noun
maŋŋáj+Adv:maŋŋá%>s PxC ; !Px generated by noun file
mieddel Postp ;
mieddela Postp ;
miedelt Postp ;
miehtelij Postp ;
miehtelin Postp ;
miehtáj Postp ;
!milda Postp ; !even if in OK, standardized with t (AK)
milta Postp ;
milte Postp ; 
nali Postp ;
nalta Postp ;
nalte Postp ;
nalá Postp ;
nanna:nanºna Postp ;
niedjen Postp ;
nuorttal Pp ;	 !derived noun
nuorttala Pp ;	 !derived noun
nuorttalij Pp ; !derived noun
nuorttalin Pp ; !derived noun
nuorttalis Pp ; !derived noun
næjgga Postp ;
næjkka Postp ;
oarjebuj Pp ; !comp noun
oarjebun Pp ; !comp noun
oarjebus Pp ; !comp noun
oarjjela Pp ;	    !derived noun
oarjjelattjan Pp ; !derived noun
oarjjelin Pp ;	    !derived noun
oarjjelis Pp ;	    !derived noun
oavŋela Postp ;
oavŋelappot Postp ; !what is this? surely an adverb if anything
oavŋev Postp ; !
radje Postp ; !noun
raje Postp ; !noun
rajen Postp ; !noun
rajes Postp ; !noun
rajev Postp ; !noun
rastá Postp ;
rastá Pp ;
rádje Postp ; !noun
rádjáj Postp ; !noun
ráje Postp ; !noun
rájen Postp ; !noun
rájes Postp ; !noun
rájev Postp ; !noun
sadjáj Postp ; !noun
sajen Postp ; !noun
siegen Postp ; !
sieges Postp ; !
sinna:sinºna Postp ;
sinna Postp ;
sinne Postp ;
sisi Postp ;
sissta Postp ;
sisste Postp ;
sissŋela Pp ;	   !derived noun
sissŋelij Pp ;	   !derived noun
sissŋelin Postp ; !derived noun
sissŋelin Pp ;	   !derived noun
sissŋelis Pp ;	   !derived noun
sisá Postp ; 
sisŋelt Pp ;
såggela Pp ; !derived noun
såggelij Pp ; !derived noun
såggelin Pp ; !derived noun
sæhkáj Postp ; !
tagá Postp ;
tjadá Pp ;
ukeslij Postp ; !derived noun, besides ukselij (OK)
ukselij Postp ; !derived noun, 
ukselis Postp ; !derived noun, 
villáj Postp ; !
vuoksjuj Postp ; ! from parallellkorp
vuole Postp ; !noun
vuolebusj Postp ; !adj
vuolelt Pp ;
vuolen Postp ; !noun
vuoles Postp ; !noun
vuolev Postp ; !noun
vuolle Postp ; !noun
vuolle Pp ;
vuollel Pp ;		   !derived noun
vuollela Pp ;		   !derived noun
vuollelattjaj Postp ; !derived noun
vuollelattjan Pp ;	   !derived noun
vuollelij Pp ;		   !derived noun
vuollelin Postp ;	   !derived noun
vuollelin Pp ;		   !derived noun
vuollelis Pp ;		   !derived noun
vuollen Postp ;
vuolláj Postp ; !noun
vuosstelij Postp ; !derived noun
vuosstelin Postp ; !derived noun
vuosstelis Postp ; !derived noun
vuossti Postp ;
vuossti Pp ;
vuosstij Postp ;
vuosstáj Postp ;
váni Pp ;
ålen Postp ; !
ålggola Pp ;  !derived noun
ålggolij Pp ; !derived noun
ålggolin Pp ; !derived noun
ålggolis Pp ; !derived noun
ålgobuj Pp ; !compared noun
ålgobun Pp ; !compared noun
ålgolt Postp ;
!åvddaj Postp ; !typo of åvddåj: short first syll å requires a->å in second syll
åvddåj Postp ;
åvddål+Use/MT:åvddål Postp ;	   !derived noun
åvddål+Use/MT:åvddål Pp ;	   !derived noun
åvddåla Pp ;	   !derived noun
åvddålasj Pp ;	   !derived noun
åvddålattjan Pp ; !derived noun
åvddålij Pp ;	   !derived noun
åvddålin Pp ;	   !derived noun
åvddålis Pp ;	   !derived noun
åvdebuj Pp ; !adj
åvdebun Pp ; !adj
åvdebus Pp ; !adj
åvdebuttjan Pp ; !adj
åvdep Pp ; !adj
åvdålt Postp ;
åvdån Postp ; !noun
åvdån+Adv:åvdå%>n PxC ; !!Doesn't give px, sg nom form is always firstcmp
åvdås Postp ; !noun
åvdås+Adv:åvdå%>st PxC ; !Doesn't give px, sg nom form is always firstcmp
